dev/proper-noun/proper-noun.ne.dix
  <!-- भट्टराई; भट्टराई; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भट्टराई__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- महावीर; महावीर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="महावीर__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- महाकाली; महाकाली; 1 -->
    <pardef n="महाकाली__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ललितपुर; ललितपुर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ललितपुर__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सिंह; सिंह; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सिंह__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मदन; मदन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मदन__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कोशी; कोशी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कोशी__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रुस; रुस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रुस__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- माझी; माझी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="माझी__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- देवेन्द्र; देवेन्द्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="देवेन्द्र__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सुमन; सुमन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सुमन__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सीता; सीता; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सीता__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- दीक्षित; दीक्षित; 1 -->
    <pardef n="दीक्षित__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विकास; विकास; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विकास__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रताप; प्रताप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रताप__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शीला; शीला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शीला__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भास्कर; भास्कर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भास्कर__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रत्ना; रत्ना; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रत्ना__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मोरङ्ग; मोरङ्ग; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मोरङ्ग__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भट्ट; भट्ट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भट्ट__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सती; सती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सती__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कोइराला; कोइराला; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कोइराला__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कांग्रेस; कांग्रेस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कांग्रेस__np_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शङ्कर; शङ्कर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शङ्कर__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बम्बै; बम्बै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बम्बै__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भण्डारी; भण्डारी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भण्डारी__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मरिचमान; मरिचमान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मरिचमान__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पुष्पलाल; पुष्पलाल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पुष्पलाल__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मोहन; मोहन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मोहन__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बुश; बुश; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बुश__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- गोरखा; गोरखा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="गोरखा__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ढुङ्गाना; ढुङ्गाना; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ढुङ्गाना__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ब्रह्मा; ब्रह्मा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ब्रह्मा__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- काठमाडौं; काठमाडौं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="काठमाडौं__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विमल; विमल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विमल__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रधान; प्रधान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रधान__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मोती; मोती; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मोती__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="भट्टराई"><i>भट्टराई</i><par n="भट्टराई__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="महावीर"><i>महावीर</i><par n="महावीर__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="महाकाली"><i>महाकाली</i><par n="महाकाली__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="ललितपुर"><i>ललितपुर</i><par n="ललितपुर__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="सिंह"><i>सिंह</i><par n="सिंह__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मदन"><i>मदन</i><par n="मदन__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कोशी"><i>कोशी</i><par n="कोशी__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="रुस"><i>रुस</i><par n="रुस__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="माझी"><i>माझी</i><par n="माझी__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="देवेन्द्र"><i>देवेन्द्र</i><par n="देवेन्द्र__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सुमन"><i>सुमन</i><par n="सुमन__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सीता"><i>सीता</i><par n="सीता__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="दीक्षित"><i>दीक्षित</i><par n="दीक्षित__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="विकास"><i>विकास</i><par n="विकास__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रताप"><i>प्रताप</i><par n="प्रताप__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="शीला"><i>शीला</i><par n="शीला__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="भास्कर"><i>भास्कर</i><par n="भास्कर__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="रत्ना"><i>रत्ना</i><par n="रत्ना__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मोरङ्ग"><i>मोरङ्ग</i><par n="मोरङ्ग__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="भट्ट"><i>भट्ट</i><par n="भट्ट__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सती"><i>सती</i><par n="सती__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कोइराला"><i>कोइराला</i><par n="कोइराला__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कांग्रेस"><i>कांग्रेस</i><par n="कांग्रेस__np_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="शङ्कर"><i>शङ्कर</i><par n="शङ्कर__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="बम्बै"><i>बम्बै</i><par n="बम्बै__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="भण्डारी"><i>भण्डारी</i><par n="भण्डारी__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मरिचमान"><i>मरिचमान</i><par n="मरिचमान__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="पुष्पलाल"><i>पुष्पलाल</i><par n="पुष्पलाल__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मोहन"><i>मोहन</i><par n="मोहन__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="बुश"><i>बुश</i><par n="बुश__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="गोरखा"><i>गोरखा</i><par n="गोरखा__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="ढुङ्गाना"><i>ढुङ्गाना</i><par n="ढुङ्गाना__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ब्रह्मा"><i>ब्रह्मा</i><par n="ब्रह्मा__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="काठमाडौं"><i>काठमाडौं</i><par n="काठमाडौं__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="विमल"><i>विमल</i><par n="विमल__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रधान"><i>प्रधान</i><par n="प्रधान__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मोती"><i>मोती</i><par n="मोती__np_m_aa"/></e>
